myenv/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_id_ID.dic
su1pe2r1
su1pe3r2i1or1
supe1r2i
superi1o
su1pe2r2s2
su1r1
su2r1ga
sur1g
su1ru2h1
su1ru
su1r2u2p1
su2r1ve1i
sur1v
su2r1ya
sur1y
su1sa
su1sa2h1
su1sa2h1a2n1
su1sa1ha1
su1su1
su1su2h1
su1su2k1
su1su3k2an1
susu1ka
su1su2l1
su1su3l2a2h1
susu1la
su1su2n1
su1su2p1
su1su2t1
su1te1r2a
su1te
suter1
su1tra1
su1ve1ni1r1
su1ve
suve1ni
s1v
s1w
swa1na1ma1
swa1na
swa1na2m1
swa1si1lan1d
swa1si
swasi1la
swis1s
sw1t
sy
syah1
sya1ha
sya1hi
sya1i2r1
syai
sya1ra1kat
sya1ra
sya1r2ak
sya2r3a1k1a
sya1ra2t1
syat1
sye1ra
syi1rik
syir1
syu1ha1da
syu1ha
1syu1ku2r1
syu1ku
syu1r2uk
syur1
syu1ru
s1z
ta
ta1a
ta1a2t1
ta1ba2h1
ta1ba2n1
ta1b1r4a2k1
tab1r
tab3r4a
ta1bu
ta1bu2h1
ta1bu1la3t2or1
tabul
tabu1la
tabu1la2t1
tabula1to
ta1di
ta1di1lah
t1adi2l1
tadi1la
ta1gi
ta1gi2h1
ta1ha2n1
ta1ha
ta1ha2p1
tah1bi2s1
tah1b
ta1hu
ta1hu2n1
ta1ja2m1
ta1ja
ta1ka
ta1ka2r1
tak1di2r1
tak1d
ta3k2el
ta1ke1
ta1kha1yul
takha1yu
ta1ku2t1
ta1ku
ta1la
ta2l1an
ta3l2a2n2g1
ta1ma
ta1ma2k1
ta1ma2t1
tam1b
tam1ba2l1
tam1p
tam1pa2r1
tam1pi2l1
ta1mu1
ta1na
ta1na2m1
tan1d
tan1da1i1
tan1du2s1
tan2g1
t2a1ng2an1
tang1a
tan2g1gu1lan2g1
tang1g
tanggu1la
tanginy
ta1ng2i2n1
tang1i
ta1ng2i2s1
ta3ng2i1um
tangi1u
tang1k
tang1ka2i1
tang1ka2p1
tang1ka2s1
tang1ki2s1
ta1ng2o1
tan1k
tan1ku
tan1ta2n2g3
tan1t
tanta
tan1te
ta1nya1
tany
ta1ny2a1m2u
ta1nya2m1
ta3p2ek
ta1pe
ta1pi
ta1pi1o1ka
tapi1o
ta1ra
ta1ra2b1
ta3r2a1k1a2n1
ta1r2ak
ta2r3a1k1a
ta1ri
ta1ri1a
ta1ri1a2n1
ta1ri2k1
ta1ri2k2h
tar1sel
tar1s
tarse1
tar1su
3t2ar1sus
ta1ru
ta1ru2h1
tas1
ta1se1
ta2s1i
ta2s2i3n2ya
ta1si2n1
tasiny
ta3s2i2s
ta1ta
ta1ta1ba3h2a1sa
tata1ba2h1
tataba1ha
tataba1has
ta1ta2h1
ta1t1a2n1
ta3t2a2n2g1
ta1ta2p1
ta1ta2r1
ta1to
ta3t2o2r1
ta1to3r2i1
ta1tu
ta3t2u2s1
ta1wa
ta1wa2l1
ta1wa2n1
ta1wa2r1
ta1wa3r2ikh
tawa1ri
t1b
t1c
t1d
te1bu
te1b
te1bukan
te1bu2k1
tebu1ka
te1de4n2g3
te1de
tem1b
tem1bu4s3
tem1bu
tem1p
tem1pa2h1
te2m1pa
te2m1pa4t3i
te2m1pa2t1
te2m1pe2l3
te2m1pe
te2m1pe5l4e2n2g
tempe1le
tem1pe3r3a3t2u2r1
te2m1pe2r3
tempe1r2a
tempe1r2at
tempera1tu
tem1pu2h1
te2m1pu
tem1pu2r1
tem1pu3r2u2n2g1
tempu1ru
tempu1r2u2n1
ten1d
ten1de1r
te1ng2a1da2h1
teng1a
ten2g
teng1a1da
te1ng2a2h1
te1ngak
te1nga1lan
tenga1la1
te1ng1a2r
te1nga3ra
te1ng2a2s1
teng1g
teng1ge1la2m1
tengge1la
teng1ge2r1
teng1i
te1ng2ik
teng1k
teng1ko1r2a2k1
tengkor1
tengko1ra
te1ngo2k1
tengo
te1ng1u
te2n1t
ten1ta2n2g3
te2n1ta
ten1te1ra2m1
tenter1
tente1r2a
te1nu2l1
te1nu
te1nu2n1
te1nu2n2g1
te1nu1sa
te1o
te1o1kra1
te1o2k1
teok1r
te1o1ri
teor1
te1pa
te1pa2t1
te1pu
te1pu2k1
ter1
te1r2a
te2r3a1b
te2r3a1d
te3r4a1da
te2r3a1gak
te1ra1ga
te2r2a1la
te1ra2l1
te2r3a1la2h1
te2r3a1la2n2g1
te1r2a1li
te2r3am1bau
te1ra2m1
te1r2am1b
te2r3a2m1bi2l1
te2r3am1bu2n2g3
teram1bu
te1ran
te1r2a1na
te2r3a2n1ca2m1
te1ra2n1ca
teran1c
te1r2a2n2g1
te2r3a5n2g2a2h
terang1a
te2r3a2ng3ka2t1
terang1k
te2r3a2ng1kup
te1r2a1ni1a
te1r2a1ni1
te2r3a1ni1ay
te2r3a2n1ja
te1r2a2n1j
te4r5a2n1tu2k1
te2r1an1t
te1r2a1nya1
terany
te2r3a1nya2r
te1r2a2p1
te1r2a3p2an2g1
tera1pa
terap1an
te1r2a3p2e1u
tera1pe
te1r2a3p2i
te2r3a3p2u2n2g1
te1r2a1pu
tera1pun1
te2r3a1r
te3r4a1ri
te1r2as
te1r2a1tai
te1rat
te1ra1ta
te1r2a1tak
te1r2a1tu
te1r2a1wa2n1
tera1wa
te1r2a1wa2n2g1
ter1be1t1i
ter1b
ter1bet
ter1bi2t1
te1r2e1ka2m1
te1rek
tere1ka
ter1e1la2k1
tere1la1
te1ren
te1r2en1da2h1
te1ren1d
teren1da
te2r1en1dap
te1r2en1ta2n2g1
te1re2n1t
tere2n1ta
te1r2e1o
te1r2i1
te1r2i1a2k1
teri1a
te1r2i2k1
te1r2i3k2a
te2r3i3k2a2t1
te1r2i2n1
te2r3i2n1di1ka1si
teri2n1d
terindi1ka
te1r2i2n2g
te2r3i3n2ga2t1
tering1a
te2r3i2n1jak1
teri2n1j
te1r2i3n2ya
teriny
te1ri1o
te1ri1or1
te1ri1o1ri
te2r3i3r2i4n2g1
terir1
te2r3i1sak
te1ri2s1
te1ri3s2a
te2r3i2s1ti1
teris1t
ter2m
ter3ma
ter3me
ter3mi1
ter3mi2n
ter3mi3na
ter1mi1na2t1
ter1mi3ni
ter3mi3no
ter3mi2s
ter3mo
te2r1te1r2a
ter1t
terter1
1t2e1si
3t2e1sis
te1te2k1
te1te
te1te2n2g1
te1t2e2r1
te1t2e2r1an
tete1r2a
te1te2s1
te1wa2s1
te1wa
t1f
t1g
tg1l
t1h
thai1lan1d
thai
thai1la
ti1da2k1
ti1da
ti1ka
ti1kai
ti1ka2m1
ti1la
ti3la2n2g1
tim1b
tim1bu2n1
tim1bu
tin1d
tin1da2k1
tin1da
1tin2g1
1ting1ga2l1
ting1g
ti3pe
ti1pi
ti3p2i2s1
ti1pu
ti3pun2g1
ti1pun1
ti1r2
ti3r2ah
tira
ti2r3ta
tir1t
ti1ru
ti1ti
ti1ti2p1
ti1ti2r2
ti1ti2s1
ti1u
ti1u2p1
t1j
t1k
t1l
t1m
t1n
to1ko
to1ko2h1
to2k1ton
tok1t
tok1tron1
tol
to1la2k1
to1la
to1la2n1
to1leh
to1le
to1le1ra2n1
tole1ra1
to1lo
to1lo2l1
to1ng2a
ton2g
ton1jo2l1
ton1j
ton1to2n1
ton1t
to1ra
tor1
to1rak1s
to1r2ak
to1re1a
to1re
to1re2h1
to1ret
to1ri1
to1ri1um
tori1u
to1tal
to1ta
to1ta1li1tas1
tota1li
totali1ta
to1ta1li1te2r3
totali1te
t1p
t1q
tra1dik1si
tra1di
tradik1s
tra1di1si
tra1di1si1o1na2l1
tradisi1o
tradisio1na
1tra1gu2s
t1ra1gu1
t1r2ak
t2rak1t
t2rak1ti1r2
tran1s1
tran1s2i
trans1por1ta2s1i
trans1p
transpor1t
transpor1
transporta
transportas1
trau1ma
trau
tra1u2m1
tri1lin2g1
tri1li
tri1li1u2n1
trili1u
tri1ng1en
tri2n2g
tringe
tri1plek1s
trip1l
tro1b1r
t1ruh
t1s
t1t
tu1a
tu1a2t
tu1bu2h1
tu1bu
tu1d
tu1du2h1
tu1du
tu1ha2n1
tu1ha
tu1kah1
tu1ka
tu1kan
tu1ka2r1
tu1la
tu1la2r1
tu1l1i
tu1l2i2s1
tu1lu
tu1lu2s1
tum1b
tum1bu2h1
tum1bu
tum1p
tum1pa2h1
tum1pu2k1
tu1na
tu1n2a2i
tun1d
tun1du2k1
tu1ngau
tun2g
tung1a
tung1g
tung1ga2k1
tung1gu1
tung1gu2l1
tung1gu3l2a2h1
tunggu1la
tun1j
tun1ju2k1
tun1t
tun1tu2n1
tun1tu2t1
tur2g
tur1
tur3gi
tu1ri
tu1ru
tu1r2u2n1
tu3r2u2n2g1
tu3r2u2t1
tu1to1
tut1s
tu1tu
tu1tu2p1
t1v
t1w
t1y
t1z
u1a
u1a2k1
u1a3k2a
u1a3k2u
u1al
u1a1la
u1a1la1i1kum
ua1la2i1
uala1ik
ualai1ku
u1an2g1
u1a2p1
u1a3p2a
u1a4p3an
u1a3p2u
u1a1ra
u1a1ra1k1a2n1
ua1r2ak
ua2r3a1k1a
u1a1sa
u1a1sa3k2
u1ba
u1ba2h1
u1ba3h2a2n1
uba1ha
u1ba2n1
u1be
u1be2r3a1n
uber1
ube1r2a
u1bi
u1bo
u1bu
u1bu2n2g3
u1ca
u1ca2p1
u1ce
u1ci
u1ci2l1
u1co
u1cu
u1da
u1da2h1
u1de
u1di
u1do
u1du
u1e
u1en1s
u1en1si
u1fa
u1fe
u1fi
u1fo
u1fu
u1ga
u1ga2s1
u1ge
u1gi
u1go
u1gu
u1ha
u1he
u1hi
u1ho
u1hu
u1i
u1ja
u1ja2n2g3
u1ja2r1
u1je
u1ji
u1jo
u1ju
u1ka
u1ka1r1a
u1ke1
u1ki
u1ki2r1
u1kir1a2n
uki3r4a1
u1ko
u1kra1
uk1r
u1kra1i1na
uk1r2ai
u1ku
u1ku1le1le
uku1le
u1ku2p1
u1ku2r1
u1la
u1la2h1
u1lai1nya
ulai
ula1i2n1
ulainy
u1lan2g1
u1la2r1an
ula1ra
u1la2s1
u1la3s2i
u1le
ul1i
u1l2i1ka
u1l2i1kan
u1l2in
ulin2g1
u1l3i1nya
uliny
u1li2r1
u1l2i2s1
u2l3i2s1la2m1
ulis1la
ulis1l
u1lo
u1lu
u1lu2h1
u1lu1r1
u1ma
u1me
u1mi
u1mo
um1p
um1pa2h1
um1pa2s1
um1pu2k1
u1mu
u1mu2m1
u1na
u1nai
u1nai1kan
una1i2k1
unai1ka
un1d
un1du2r1
u1ne
un2g
u1ngar1an
ung1a
ung1ar
unga1ra
ung1g
ung1ga2k1
ung1gu2l1
ung1k
ung1ka
ung1ka1p1a2n
ung1ka2p1
ungka1pa
u1ngu2t1
u1ni
un1j
un1ju2k1
u1no
un1su2r1
un1s
unsu
un1t
un1tun2g1
u1nu
u1nya
uny
u1o
u1pa
upa1ca5ra
upa1ca2r1
upa1ca
u1pa2h1
u1pa1ya1
u1pe
u1pi
u1po
u1pu
u1qa
u1qe
u1qi
u1qo
u1qu
ur1
u1ra
u1r4a2k1
u1r2a2p1
u1r2a2t1
u1re
u1ri
u1ro
u1ru
u1r2u1gu1ay
uru1gu
urugu1a
u1r2u2n1
u1r2u2n2g1
u1r2u3n2y2a
uruny
u1r2u2s1
u1r2u2t1
u1sa
u1sa1ha1
u1sa2t1
u1se1
u1si
us1k
us1ku2p1
u1so
u1su
u1su2k1
u1su2l1
u1su2n1
u1sun2g
u1su2t1
u1ta
u1ta1ma
u1ta1ma3k2a2n1
uta1ma2k1
utama1ka
u1tan2g1
u1tar
u1ta1ra
u1ta3r2a1k1a2n1
uta1r2ak
uta2r3a1k1a
u3ta2s1i1
utas1
u1ta2s2i3n2ya
uta1si2n1
utasiny
u1te
u1ti
u1to
u1tu
u1tu2h1
u1tu2p1
u1tu2r1
u1tu2s1
u1u
u1va
u1ve
u1vi
u1vo
u1vu
u1wa
u1we
u1wi
u1wo
u1wu
u1ya
u1ye
u1yi
u1yo
u1yu
u1za
u1ze
u1zi
u1zo
u1zu
va1to1ri1
va1to
va3t2or1
v1b
v1c
v1d
ve1ri
ve1t2e1r2an
ve1te
ve1t2er1
vete1r2a
v1f
v1g
v1h
vin1ce2n2t
vin1c
vi1ru
vir1
vi1r2u2s1
v1j
v1k
v1l
v1m
v1n
vol1t
vol1ta1se1
volta
voltas1
v1p
v1q
v1r
v1s
v1t
v1v
v1w
v1y
v1z
wa1bah
wa1bau
wa1ca1na
wa1ca
wa1can1
wa1jib1
wa1ji
wa1jib1an1ku
waji1ba
wajiban2k1
wa1jik1
wa1ki2l1
wa1ki
wa1na
wan1an
wa1ng1i
wan2g1
wan1t
wan1ta2h1
wanta
war1na1
war1n
war1ni1
wa1si
was3i3n2ya
wa1si2n1
wasiny
wa3s2ir1
was1pa1da1
was1p
waspa1d
wat1t
wa1wan1ca1ra1
wa1wa
wawan1ca
wawan1c
w1b
w1c
w1d
we2r1a
we1ren2g1
w1f
w1g
w1h
wi1du1r2i
wi1du
wi1du2r3
wi1r2a
wir1
wi1r2a1kar1ya
wi1r2ak
wi2r3a1ka
wira1ka2r1
wirakar1y
w1j
w1k
w1l
w1m
w1n
w1p
w1q
w1r
w1s
w1t
w1v
w1w
w1y
w1z
xe1no1
xe1no1k2ra1
xenok1r
xe1ro1
yah1
ya1hu
ya1h2u1di
yak
ya1ki2n1
ya1ki
yar1d
y1b
y1c
y1d
y1f
y1g
y1h
y1j
y1k
y1l
y1m
y1n
y1p
y1q
y1r
y1s
y1t
yu1go1sla1vi1a
yu1go
yugos1l
yugosla1vi
yu1ris1
yur1
yu1ri
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z
za1i2r1
zai
za1i1re
za1li2m1
za1li
za1li2m1a2n1
zali1ma1
z1b
z1c
z1d
z1f
z1g
z1h
zi1na
zi1ra2h1
zir1
zira
z1j
z1k
z1l
z1m
z1n
z1p
z1q
z1r
z1s
z1t
zu1ri
zur1
z1v
z1w
z1y
z1z
